District of Columbia statutes.
29A-201.14

Repealed

Registered office and registered agent.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1286, ch. 854, § 618
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 533, ch. 1329
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 3(b), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-214.
1981 Ed., § 29-214.
2001 Ed., § 29-201.14.